Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202676-3210
Compliance with Real Property Appraiser Act.

Any employee of or independent contractor to an appraisal management company that holds a registration, including any AMC appraiser included on an appraisal management company's appraiser panel engaged in real property appraisal practice, shall comply with the Real Property Appraiser Act, including the Uniform Standards of Professional Appraisal Practice.

Laws 2011, LB410, § 10;

Laws 2018, LB17, § 12;

Laws 2020, LB808, § 92.

Real Property Appraiser Act, see section 76-2201.